Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-208
Source and construction.

Sections 30-201 to 30-207 derive from Annex to Convention of October 26, 1973, Providing a Uniform Law on the Form of an International Will. In interpreting and applying the Uniform Wills Recognition Act (1977), regard shall be had to its international origin and to the need for uniformity in its interpretation.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 8.